Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3756
Pledge or mortgage under federal program; deduction of fee.

In the case of a pledge or mortgage of dry beans as security for a loan under the federal price support program, the fee shall be deducted from the proceeds of such loan at the time the loan is made.

Laws 1987, LB 145, § 22.